Missouri, session 2026, SB1389.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 537.775, to read as
follows:
537.775. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Biological sex", the biological and physical
indications of male or female in the context of reproductive
potential or capacity as determined by chromosomes,
naturally occurring sex hormones, and anatomy, and as
indicated on an individual's birth certificate without
regard to an individual's psychological, chosen, or
subjective experience of gender;
(2) "Business entity", any corporation, association,
firm, partnership, limited liability company, sole
proprietorship, or any other type of business entity in this
state that operates a premises, regardless of whether the
premises is open to the public;
(3) "Changing facility", a space designated for
multiple individuals to dress or undress within the same
space, including, but not limited to, a dressing room,

SB 1389 2
fitting room, locker room, changing room, or shower room.
The term "changing facility" does not include a unisex
changing facility;
(4) "Disabled", an individual with a mental, physical,
or developmental impairment that substantially limits one or
more major life activities or the ability to provide
adequately for one's care or protection where such
impairment is verified by medical findings;
(5) "First responder", any law enforcement officer,
firefighter, paramedic, emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician, or other persons
trained and authorized by law or rule to render emergency
medical assistance or treatment;
(6) "Gender", the psychological, behavioral, social,
and cultural aspects of being male or female;
(7) "Premises", real property that includes restrooms
or changing facilities and that is in the sole possession of
and under the direct control of the business entity;
(8) "Restroom", a space that includes a toilet or
urinal. The term "restroom" does not include a unisex
restroom;
(9) "Unisex changing facility", a room intended for a
single occupant or family in which one or more persons may
be in a state of undress, including, but not limited to, a
dressing room, fitting room, locker room, changing room, or
shower room that is enclosed by floor-to-ceiling walls and
accessed by a full door with a secure lock that prevents
another individual from entering while the changing facility
is in use;
(10) "Unisex restroom", a room that includes a toilet
or urinal and that is intended for a single occupant or
family, is enclosed by floor-to-ceiling walls, and is

SB 1389 3
accessed by a full door with a secure lock that prevents
another individual from entering while the room is in use.
2. Any individual may bring a cause of action against
a business entity that has a policy allowing for individuals
of one biological sex into changing facilities or restrooms
designated for use by the opposite biological sex and in
which the individual's privacy or expectation of privacy was
violated in a changing facility or restroom of the business
entity that matched the individual's biological sex by an
individual of the opposite biological sex.
3. The prevailing plaintiff of a cause of action
brought pursuant to this section shall be entitled to
recover:
(1) Nominal damages;
(2) Compensatory damages;
(3) Punitive damages in an amount not less than ten
thousand dollars; and
(4) Costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
4. It shall be an affirmative defense to an action
brought pursuant to this section if the individual that was
permitted entry into a changing facility or restroom that
did not match the individual's biological sex was:
(1) A disabled individual or a child under the age of
thirteen who was accompanied, escorted, supervised, or
assisted by an adult, who was of the same biological sex as
the biological sex for which the changing room or restroom
was designated;
(2) An employee or agent of the business entity that
entered, after a clear and understandable oral notice of
entry, the changing facility or restroom to:
(a) Clean the changing facility or restroom; or

SB 1389 4
(b) Secure or ensure the safety or well-being of
individuals within the changing facility or restroom; or
(3) A first responder in the lawful performance of his
or her duties.
✓